Mississippi, session 2026, SB2531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 43-1-29.2, Mississippi Code of 1972: 43-1-29.2.  (1)  As used in the section, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein: (a)  "Candy" means any preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops or pieces, but does not include any preparation containing flour and does not include any item requiring refrigeration. (b)  "Soft drinks" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or artificial sweeteners, but does not include any beverage that contains milk or milk products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty percent (50%) vegetable or fruit juice by volume. (2)  The Department of Human Services is hereby directed to develop and submit a request to the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) for a waiver that will permit the Department of Human Services to prohibit the purchase of soft drinks and candy using Supplemental Nutritional Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits.  This application shall adhere to any USDA guidelines for SNAP waiver requests. (3)  If a waiver under subsection (2) of this section is not granted or if a previous or existing waiver is not in effect or is rescinded, the Department of Human Services shall request such a waiver annually until such waiver is granted.  The Department of Human Services shall submit the initial waiver request no later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this act. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.